Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.04
Beneficial substance; label; contents; bulk; statement; common name; pesticide; how labeled.

(1) Beginning on and after January 1, 2027, any packaged beneficial substance distributed in this state, except custom-blended products, shall have placed on or affixed to the package a label stating clearly and conspicuously (a) the net weight or measure of the product, (b) the information required by subdivisions (1)(c) and (d) of section 81-2,162.03, (c) the total percentage of all active ingredients in the beneficial substance, (d) the identification and percentage of each individual active ingredient, (e) the total percentage of the inactive ingredients, (f) the identification and percentage of each individual inactive ingredient which comprises more than two percent of the entire beneficial substance, (g) under a category entitled other inactive ingredients, the total percentage of the remaining inactive ingredients which individually do not comprise two percent or more of the beneficial substance, and (h) for any product that claims to contain any microorganism, the expiration date for use of the product and any required storage conditions for the product.

(2) If any beneficial substance is distributed in bulk, a written or printed statement of the weight and the information required by subdivisions (1)(c) and (d) of section 81-2,162.03 and by subdivisions (1)(c) through (h) of this section shall accompany delivery and be supplied to the purchaser.

(3) Whenever a beneficial substance is so comprised as to be recognized by a name commonly understood by ordinary individuals, such name shall be prominently and conspicuously displayed on the label.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act, any beneficial substance that is also a pesticide, labeled in conformance with the Pesticide Act, shall be deemed to be labeled in conformance with the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act.

Laws 1978, LB 692, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 24, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 201, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 37;

Laws 2015, LB93, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 15.
March 17, 2026
Pesticide Act, see section 2-2622.

"Product" under sections 81-2,162.01 to 81-2,162.07, R.R.S.1943, means the product which is sold in the normal course of business to the ultimate consumer, and consists of the finished product. "Manufacture" means manufacture of the finished product. "Distributes" means distribution of the finished product, and not a mere ingredient. PPG Industries Canada LTD v. Kreuscher, 204 Neb. 220, 281 N.W.2d 762 (1979).